sl-SI: Desetletje starinskih oglasov: 1900-ta; 1910-ta; 1920-ta; 1930-ta; 1940-ta; 1950-ta; 1960-ta; 1970-ta; 1980-ta; 1990-ta; 2000-ta; 2010-ta; 2020-ta; Pred 1900; Neznano; Drugo
en: Vintage advertisement decade: 1900s; 1910s; 1920s; 1930s; 1940s; 1950s; 1960s; 1970s; 1980s; 1990s; 2000s; 2010s; 2020s; Pre-1900; Unknown; Other
nb: Tiår for eldre reklame: 1900-tallet; 1910-tallet; 1920-tallet; 1930-tallet; 1940-tallet; 1950-tallet; 1960-tallet; 1970-tallet; 1980-tallet; 1990-tallet; 2000-tallet; 2010-tallet; 2020-tallet; Før 1900; Ukjent; Annet
nl: Vintage advertentie decennium: Jaren 1900; Jaren 1910; Jaren 1920; Jaren 1930; Jaren 1940; Jaren 1950; Jaren 1960; Jaren 1970; Jaren 1980; Jaren 1990; Jaren 2000; Jaren 2010; Jaren 2020; Voor 1900; Onbekend; Overige
da: Årti for vintageannonce: 1900'erne; 1910'erne; 1920'erne; 1930'erne; 1940'erne; 1950'erne; 1960'erne; 1970'erne; 1980'erne; 1990'erne; 2000'erne; 2010'erne; 2020'erne; Før 1900; Ukendt; Andet
zh-TW: 復古廣告年代: 1900 年代; 1910 年代; 1920 年代; 1930 年代; 1940 年代; 1950 年代; 1960 年代; 1970 年代; 1980 年代; 1990 年代; 2000 年代; 2010 年代; 2020 年代; 1900 年以前; 未知; 其他
ja: ヴィンテージ広告年代: 1900年代; 1910年代; 1920年代; 1930年代; 1940年代; 1950年代; 1960年代; 1970年代; 1980年代; 1990年代; 2000年代; 2010年代; 2020年代; 1900年代以前; 不明; その他
de: Jahrzehnt der Vintage-Werbung: 1900er; 1910er; 1920er; 1930er; 1940er; 1950er; 1960er; 1970er; 1980er; 1990er; 2000er; 2010er; 2020er; Vor 1900; Unbekannt; Sonstiges
ko: 빈티지 광고 연대: 1900년대; 1910년대; 1920년대; 1930년대; 1940년대; 1950년대; 1960년대; 1970년대; 1980년대; 1990년대; 2000년대; 2010년대; 2020년대; 1900년대 이전; 알 수 없음; 기타
pl: Dekada reklamy vintage: Lata 1900.; Lata 1910.; Lata 1920.; Lata 1930.; Lata 1940.; Lata 1950.; Lata 1960.; Lata 1970.; Lata 1980.; Lata 1990.; Lata 2000.; Lata 2010.; Lata 2020.; Przed 1900 r.; Nieznane; Inne
sk-SK: Desaťročie vintage reklám: Roky 1900 – 1909; Roky 1910 – 1919; 20. roky 20. storočia; 30. roky 20. storočia; 40. roky 20. storočia; 50. roky 20. storočia; 60. roky 20. storočia; 70. roky 20. storočia; 80. roky 20. storočia; 90. roky 20. storočia; Nulté roky 21. storočia; Roky 2010 – 2019; 20. roky 21. storočia; Pred rokom 1900; Neznáme; Iné
tr: Vintage reklam on yılı: 1900'ler; 1910'lar; 1920'ler; 1930'lar; 1940'lar; 1950'ler; 1960'lar; 1970'ler; 1980'ler; 1990'lar; 2000'ler; 2010'lar; 2020'ler; 1900 öncesi; Bilinmiyor; Diğer
sv: Vintagereklamens årtionde: 1900-talet; 1910-talet; 1920-talet; 1930-talet; 1940-talet; 1950-talet; 1960-talet; 1970-talet; 1980-talet; 1990-talet; 2000-talet; 2010-talet; 2020-talet; Före 1900; Okänd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Senovinė reklama Dešimtmetis: 1900-ieji; 1910-ieji; 1920-ieji; 1930-ieji; 1940-ieji; 1950-ieji; 1960-ieji; 1970-ieji; 1980-ieji; 1990-ieji; 2000-ieji; 2010-ieji; 2020-ieji; Iki 1900 m.; Nežinoma; Kita
th: โฆษณาโบราณระบุทศวรรษ: ทศวรรษที่ 1900; ทศวรรษที่ 1910; ทศวรรษที่ 1920; ทศวรรษที่ 1930; ทศวรรษที่ 1940; ทศวรรษที่ 1950; ทศวรรษที่ 1960; ทศวรรษที่ 1970; ทศวรรษที่ 1980; ทศวรรษที่ 1990; ทศวรรษที่ 2000; ทศวรรษที่ 2010; ทศวรรษที่ 2020; ก่อนปี 1900; ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
hu: Retró reklám évtizede: 1900-as évek; 1910-es évek; 1920-as évek; 1930-as évek; 1940-es évek; 1950-es évek; 1960-as évek; 1970-es évek; 1980-as évek; 1990-es évek; 2000-es évek; 2010-es évek; 2020-as évek; 1900 előtti; Ismeretlen; Egyéb
el: Δεκαετία vintage διαφήμισης: Δεκαετία 1900; Δεκαετία 1910; Δεκαετία 1920; Δεκαετία 1930; Δεκαετία 1940; Δεκαετία 1950; Δεκαετία 1960; Δεκαετία 1970; Δεκαετία 1980; Δεκαετία 1990; Δεκαετία 2000; Δεκαετία 2010; Δεκαετία 2020; Πριν από το 1900; Άγνωστο; Άλλο
es: Década de la publicidad vintage: Años 1900; Años 1910; Años 1920; Años 1930; Años 1940; Años 1950; Años 1960; Años 1970; Años 1980; Años 1990; Años 2000; Años 2010; Años 2020; Anterior a 1900; Desconocido; Otro
ru: Десятилетие винтажной рекламы: 1900-е; 1910-е; 1920-е; 1930-е; 1940-е; 1950-е; 1960-е; 1970-е; 1980-е; 1990-е; 2000-е; 2010-е; 2020-е; До 1900-х; Неизвестно; Другое
hr-HR: Desetljeće vintage oglasa: 1900-te; 1910-te; 1920-te; 1930-te; 1940-te; 1950-te; 1960-te; 1970-te; 1980-te; 1990-te; 2000-te; 2010-te; 2020-te; Prije 1900.; Nepoznato; Ostalo
vi: Thập kỷ quảng cáo cổ điển: Thập niên 1900; Thập niên 1910; Thập niên 1920; Thập niên 1930; Thập niên 1940; Thập niên 1950; Thập niên 1960; Thập niên 1970; Thập niên 1980; Thập niên 1990; Thập niên 2000; Thập niên 2010; Thập niên 2020; Trước năm 1900; Không xác định; Khác
ro-RO: Deceniul reclamei vintage: Anii 1900; Anii 1910; Anii 1920; Anii 1930; Anii 1940; Anii 1950; Anii 1960; Anii 1970; Anii 1980; Anii 1990; Anii 2000; Anii 2010; Anii 2020; Înainte de 1900; Necunoscut; Altele
it: Decennio della pubblicità vintage: Anni 1900; Anni 1910; Anni 1920; Anni 1930; Anni 1940; Anni 1950; Anni 1960; Anni 1970; Anni 1980; Anni 1990; Anni 2000; Anni 2010; Anni 2020; Ante 1900; Sconosciuto; Altro
fr: Décennie de la publicité ancienne: Années 1900; Années 1910; Années 1920; Années 1930; Années 1940; Années 1950; Années 1960; Années 1970; Années 1980; Années 1990; Années 2000; Années 2010; Années 2020; Avant 1900; Inconnu; Autre
bg-BG: Десетилетие на ретро рекламата: 1900-те; 1910-те; 1920-те; 1930-те; 1940-те; 1950-те; 1960-те; 1970-те; 1980-те; 1990-те; 2000-те; 2010-те; 2020-те; Преди 1900 г.; Неизвестно; Друго
zh-CN: 怀旧广告年代: 1900 年代; 1910 年代; 1920 年代; 1930 年代; 1940 年代; 1950 年代; 1960 年代; 1970 年代; 1980 年代; 1990 年代; 2000 年代; 2010 年代; 2020 年代; 1900 年以前; 未知; 其他
pt-PT: Década do anúncio vintage: Anos 1900; Anos 1910; Anos 1920; Anos 1930; Anos 1940; Anos 1950; Anos 1960; Anos 1970; Anos 1980; Anos 1990; Anos 2000; Anos 2010; Anos 2020; Anteriores a 1900; Desconhecido; Outro
fi: Vintage-mainoksen vuosikymmen: 1900-luku; 1910-luku; 1920-luku; 1930-luku; 1940-luku; 1950-luku; 1960-luku; 1970-luku; 1980-luku; 1990-luku; 2000-luku; 2010-luku; 2020-luku; Ennen 1900-lukua; Tuntematon; Muu
pt-BR: Anúncio vintage década: Anos 1900; Anos 1910; Anos 1920; Anos 1930; Anos 1940; Anos 1950; Anos 1960; Anos 1970; Anos 1980; Anos 1990; Anos 2000; Anos 2010; Anos 2020; Antes de 1900; Desconhecido; Outro
cs: Dekáda historických reklam: Nultá léta 20. století; 10. léta 20. století; 20. léta 20. století; 30. léta 20. století; 40. léta 20. století; 50. léta 20. století; 60. léta 20. století; 70. léta 20. století; 80. léta 20. století; 90. léta 20. století; Nultá léta 21. století; 10. léta 21. století; 20. léta 21. století; Před rokem 1900; Neznámé; Jiné